Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 9 Receivership Procedures Involving Trust or Pooled Assets

7-1-220.
Definitions and applicability.

As used in this part, the term:

“Pooled assets” means mortgages, securities, or other assets comprising any mortgage or securities pool operated by such financial institution (whether said assets are held in the name of the institution or a nominee therefor) or with respect to which undivided interests have been created, regardless of whether or not the financial institution is technically a trustee and regardless of whether or not certificates of participation have been issued with respect thereto.

“Trust assets” means all assets held by financial institutions as trustee, administrator, executor, guardian, or in a similar fiduciary capacity but shall not include assets held by the commercial department of the financial institution or pooled assets, as defined in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

In the event of conflict, this part and not other parts of this article or other articles of this chapter shall control as to the trust assets and the pooled assets of any financial institution in receivership.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-901, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “or pooled assets, as defined” for “or ‘pooled assets’ as defined” near the end of paragraph (a)(2).

7-1-221.
Status of department in relation to trust and pooled assets.

Upon taking possession of a financial institution, the department shall hold trust and pooled assets separate from the assets of the financial institution itself. Trust and pooled assets shall not be available for distribution to depositors, other creditors, or shareholders.

The department as receiver shall have all rights, powers, and duties of the financial institution in regard to trust and pooled assets, including title to the assets and the right to administer them.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-222.
Jurisdiction of court over trust and pooled assets.

The principal court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all matters concerning trust and pooled assets during the period that such assets are held by the department as receiver.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-223.
Substituted trustee or manager for trust and pooled assets.

Upon determining to liquidate a financial institution or if it otherwise deems it advisable, the department shall:

With leave of court, transfer all of the trust assets or all of the pooled assets or all of both types of assets to another financial institution which shall assume the responsibilities of the institution in receivership in regard to such assets and act as substituted trustee or manager; or

Give written notice, insofar as the giving of such notice is practicable, to all parties interested in trust or pooled assets that they must within 30 days after the giving of notice apply for the appointment of a substituted trustee or manager to take over the trust or pooled assets. In the event that no such application is made with respect to particular trust assets or pooled assets, the department shall itself apply for appointment of a substituted trustee or manager. Upon application by an interested party or parties or by the department, the court shall appoint as successor trustee or manager that person or corporation best able, in its judgment, to protect the interests of those interested in particular trust or pooled assets. The successor trustees or managers shall have all rights, powers, and duties of the financial institution in regard to the trust or pooled assets committed to them except as these relationships may be modified by the court in accordance with law.

Nothing in this Code section or Code Section 7-1-222 shall be construed to impair any right of the grantor or beneficiaries of trust or pooled assets under applicable instruments or otherwise to secure or provide for the appointment of a substituted trustee or manager.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-904, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-224.
Transfers to substituted trustee or manager without accounting.

In the event that the department and a substituted trustee or manager agree as to the identity and amount of the trust or pooled assets to be paid to the substituted trustee or manager and the substituted trustee or manager waives in writing the right to an accounting, then the department may transfer the trust or pooled assets to the substituted trustee or manager and will thereupon (together with the financial institution) be discharged from all liability or responsibility in connection with the trust or pooled assets.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-225.
Transfers to substituted trustee or manager with accounting; deficiencies.

Except as authorized by Code Section 7-1-224, the department shall, upon appointment of a substituted trustee or manager, file a full account with the appropriate court setting forth its administration of the trust or pooled assets and shall, upon the order of the court, transfer the trust or pooled assets to the substituted trustee or manager. Whenever the court shall determine that there is a deficiency in regard to the trust or pooled assets or that the financial institution is liable for a surcharge in connection therewith, the amount thereof shall constitute a claim against the financial institution. Such claim shall be filed in the manner of other claims with the principal court within 30 days of a final adjudication with respect to the amount thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-906, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.